District of Columbia statutes.
31-3303.12

Affiliation period.

(a)

A health maintenance organization which does not impose any preexisting condition exclusion, with respect to any particular coverage option, may impose an affiliation period for such coverage option, but only if such period is applied uniformly without regard to any health status-related factors and such period does not exceed 2 months (or 3 months in the case of a late enrollee).

(b)

An affiliation period as described in subsection (a) of this section shall begin on the enrollment date.

(c)

An affiliation period under a plan shall run concurrently with any waiting period under the plan.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-209, § 312, 45 DCR 8433
1981 Ed., § 35-1042.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3301.01.
See notes to § 31-3301.01.